Hawaii statutes.
[§472-3] Veterinary technician
qualifications. No applicant shall be registered to engage in the practice
of veterinary technology unless the applicant:

(1) Is at least eighteen years of age;

(2) Has successfully passed the Veterinary Technician
National Examination; and

(3) Meets at least one of the following conditions:

(A) Has successfully completed a course of
study at a program for veterinary technology accredited by the American
Veterinary Medical Association Committee on Veterinary Technician Education and
Activities;

(B) Is a licensed, certified, or registered
veterinary technician in good standing in another state having standards for
registration comparable to those in this State; or

(C) Prior to July 1, 2021, submits a
notarized document from an employer who is a licensed veterinarian and who
certifies that the applicant has five years or more of practical experience in Hawaii;
provided that no reciprocity shall be given for practical experience gained
outside of the State.

Before any applicant shall be eligible for
registration under this chapter, the applicant shall file an application in a
form as shall be prescribed by the department and pay to the department of
commerce and consumer affairs an application fee and all other applicable fees.
[L 2016, c 147, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next